Utah statutes.
62A-11-511.   Priority of notice or order to withhold income.

The notice to withhold under this part is prior to all other legal collection processes provided by state law, including garnishment, attachment, execution, and wage assignment.



Enacted by Chapter 232, 1997 General Session

